Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB23.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS 311.710 TO 311.820 IS CREATED
TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Abortion service" means:
1. An abortion; and
2. Any health care or other service related to or provided in conjunction
with an abortion, regardless of whether the care or service is provided
on one (1) visit or over the course of several visits; and
(b) "Seeking, obtaining, providing, or facilitating" includes but is not limited
to:
1. Reviewing or researching information related to an abortion service;
2. Expressing interest in an abortion service;
3. Offering to pay or provide, or paying or providing, financial assistance
for an abortion service;
4. Using, furnishing, providing, or disseminating any information
related to an abortion service;
5. Offering to provide or providing transportation for or related to an
abortion service;
6. Recommending, referring, arranging, assisting, or providing any
service related to obtaining an abortion service;
7. Providing any health care service that is not prohibited in this
Commonwealth related to a pregnancy;
8. Otherwise taking action to assist or obtain any abortion service; or
9. Attempting any action under subparagraphs 1. to 8. of this paragraph;
Page 1 of 4
XXXX 12/17/2025 11:26 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 252
(2) (a) A person, physician, health care provider, abortion referral or counseling
agency, employer, or other individual or entity shall not be subject to civil
liability, criminal liability, or administrative investigation for any act or
attempted act to aid or encourage any person in connection with seeking,
obtaining, providing, or facilitating an abortion service, including the
termination of a pregnancy that is provided outside of this Commonwealth
to a patient who resides in this Commonwealth and the abortion service is
lawful in the state in which it is to be provided.
(b) This subsection shall apply to any termination of a pregnancy as a result of
a patient's use of an abortion-inducing drug as defined in KRS 311.7731
provided the patient received the abortion-inducing drug outside of this
Commonwealth for the patient's personal and sole use, and the patient
ingested the abortion-inducing drug in a state other than this
Commonwealth;
(3) A medical record or other written, digital, or oral record created regarding any
action or attempted action protected under this section, or any information
contained in any record under this subsection, shall not be subject to disclosure
or sale for the purpose of:
(a) Investigating, tracking, or attempting to identify any person, physician,
health care provider, abortion referral or counseling agency, employer, or
other individual or entity; or
(b) A civil, criminal, or administrative investigation into or proceeding against
any person in connection with seeking, obtaining, providing, or facilitating
an abortion service;
(4) A physician, health care provider, or other professional licensed in this
Commonwealth shall not be subject to any disciplinary action, including
revocation, suspension, initial denial, renewal denial, limitation, or restriction of
Page 2 of 4
XXXX 12/17/2025 11:26 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 252
a license, reprimand, or monetary fine for any action or attempted action
protected under this section;
(5) A business or organization shall not be refused a license to operate or do business
in this Commonwealth, or be subject to any monetary fine, based solely upon any
action or attempted action protected under this section;
(6) A public agency or employee, representative, or agent of a public agency, shall
not implement or enforce any regulation or policy that may prevent, restrict,
impede, or provide for any retaliation against the ability of:
(a) Any person to travel across a state line for the purpose of obtaining an
abortion service that is lawful in the state in which the service is to be
provided; or
(b) Any person, physician, health care provider, abortion referral or counseling
agency, employer, or other individual or entity to assist another person
traveling across a state line for the purpose of obtaining an abortion service
that is lawful in the state in which the service is to be provided;
(7) An action protected under this section shall not by itself constitute a violation of
KRS 529.100 or 529.110;
(8) (a) Any person who is harmed by a violation of subsections (2) to (7) of this
section shall have a civil cause of action for actual and punitive damages,
court costs, and reasonable attorney's fees against the alleged violator.
(b) The civil action provided for in paragraph (a) of this subsection may be filed
in the Circuit Court for the county where the alleged violation occurred or
the county where the plaintiff resides.
(c) Any person found liable under this subsection shall be jointly and severally
liable with each other person found liable under this subsection for the
damages arising from the same violation.
(d) For purposes of this subsection, the Commonwealth waives immunity for
Page 3 of 4
XXXX 12/17/2025 11:26 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 252
equitable and declaratory relief, and for any award of monetary damages,
costs, or attorney's fees; and
(9) This section shall not be construed to create a right to the performance of an
abortion in this Commonwealth that is otherwise prohibited by the laws of this
Commonwealth.
Page 4 of 4
XXXX 12/17/2025 11:26 AM Jacketed